California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) An applicant, or their manager, for a license as a private patrol operator shall have had at least two years, which shall consist of not less than 4,000 hours of experience as a patrolperson, guard, or watchman, or the equivalent thereof as determined by the director, and one year, which shall consist of not less than 2,000 hours as manager or in an administrative position with a licensed and
 current private patrol operator. An applicant shall substantiate the claimed three years, which shall consist of not less than 6,000 hours of qualifying experience and the exact details as to the character and nature thereof by written certifications from the employer, subject to independent verification by the chief as they may determine. In the event of inability of an applicant to supply the written certifications from the employer in whole or in part, applicants may offer other written certifications from other than employers substantiating employment for consideration by the chief.

(b) An individual who, upon the determination of the chief, has served in the armed services and possesses the proper skills may be eligible to take the private
 patrol operator licensing examination. In that case, the chief may waive any other required training courses, as they determine. However, if the applicant fails the licensing examination, the chief may not thereafter waive completion of any required training courses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 29.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.2.

A person licensed as a private patrol operator shall not do any of the following:

(a) Fail to properly maintain an accurate and current record of all firearms or other deadly weapons that are in the possession of the licensee or of any employee while on duty. Within seven days after a licensee or the licensee’s employees discover that a deadly weapon that has been recorded as being in the licensee’s possession has been misplaced, lost, or stolen, or is in any other way missing, the licensee or their manager shall mail or deliver to any local law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction, a written report concerning the incident. The report shall describe fully the circumstances surrounding the incident, any injuries or damages incurred, the identity of all participants, and whether a
 police investigation was conducted.

(b) Fail to properly maintain an accurate and current record of the name, address, commencing date of employment, and position of each employee, and the date of termination of employment when an employee is terminated.

(c) Fail to properly maintain an accurate and current record of proof of completion by each employee of the licensee of the trainings and for the retention period specified in Section 7583.6.

(d) Fail to certify proof of current and valid registration for each employee who is subject to registration.

(e) Permit any employee to carry a firearm or other deadly weapon without first ascertaining that the employee is proficient in the use of each weapon to be carried. With respect to firearms, evidence of
 proficiency shall include a certificate from a firearm training facility approved by the director certifying that the employee is proficient in the use of that specified caliber of firearm and a current and valid firearm qualification permit issued by the department. With respect to other deadly weapons, evidence of proficiency shall include a certificate from a training facility approved by the director certifying that the employee is proficient in the use of that particular deadly weapon.

(f) (1) Fail to deliver to the director a written report describing the circumstances surrounding the discharge of any firearm, or physical altercation with a member of the public while on duty, by a licensee or any officer, partner, or employee of a licensee while acting within the course and scope of their employment within seven business days after the qualifying incident.

(2) The report shall be required only for physical altercations that result in any of the following:

(A) The arrest of a security guard.

(B) The filing of a police report by a member of the public.

(C) A member of the public requiring any type of first aid or other medical attention.

(D) The discharge, suspension, or reprimand of a security guard by their employer.

(E) Any physical use of force or violence on any person while on duty.

(3) The report shall include, but not be limited to, a description of any injuries or damages incurred, the identity of all participants, and whether a police investigation was
 conducted. Any report may be investigated by the director to determine if any disciplinary action is necessary.

(4) A report shall not be required when a security officer or multiple security officers are requested by hospital staff to assist in restraining a patient by either holding the patient or limiting the movement of the patient for medical or mental health reasons.

(g) Fail to notify the bureau in writing and within 30 days that a manager previously qualified pursuant to this chapter is no longer connected with the licensee.

(h) Fail to administer to each registered employee of the licensee, the review or practice training required by subdivision (e) of Section 7583.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 17.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.3.

No person required to be registered as a security guard pursuant to this chapter shall do any of the following:

(a) Fail to carry on their person, while on duty, a valid and current security guard registration card, or if pending receipt of the registration card after the bureau’s approval, a hardcopy printout of the approved security guard registration information from the bureau’s internet website and a valid picture identification pursuant to Section 7583.17.

(b) Fail to carry on their person when carrying a firearm on duty either a valid and current firearms permit, or if pending receipt of the permit after the bureau’s approval, a hardcopy printout of the approved firearms permit information from the bureau’s internet
 website and a valid picture identification pursuant to Section 7583.12.

(c) Carry or use a firearm unless they possess a valid and current firearms permit that is associated with a valid and current security guard registration issued pursuant to this chapter. 

(d) Fail to report to their employer within 24 hours of the incident the circumstances surrounding any incident involving the discharge of any firearm in which they are involved while acting within the course and scope of their employment.

(e) Carry or use a firearm or baton, as authorized by this chapter, unless the security guard is an employee of a private patrol operator licensee or an employee of the state or a political subdivision of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 697, Sec. 6.   (AB 229)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.4.

Any person registered as a security guard or patrolperson, and the employer of the security guard or patrolperson, shall deliver to the director a written report describing fully the circumstances surrounding any incident involving the discharge of any firearm in which he or she was involved while acting within the course and scope of his or her employment, within seven days after the incident. The report shall be made on a form prescribed by the director which shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) The name, address, and date of birth of the guard or patrolperson.

(b) The registration number of the guard or
 patrolperson.

(c) The firearm permit number and baton permit number of the guard or patrolperson, if applicable.

(d) The name of the employer of the person.

(e) The description of any injuries and damages that occurred.

(f) The identity of all participants in the incident.

(g) Whether a police investigation was conducted relating to the incident.

(h) The date and location of the incident. Any report may be investigated by the director to determine if any disciplinary action is necessary.

A copy of the report delivered to the director pursuant to this section shall also be delivered
 within seven days of the incident to the local police or sheriff’s department which has jurisdiction over the geographic area where the incident occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 23.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.5.

(a) Every licensee and any person employed and compensated by a licensee, other lawful business, or public agency as a security guard or patrolperson, and who in the course of that employment or business carries a firearm, shall complete a course of training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force and a course of training in the carrying and use of firearms. This subdivision shall not apply to armored vehicle guards hired prior to January 1, 1977. Armored vehicle guards hired on or after January 1, 1977, shall complete a course of training in the carrying and use of firearms, but shall not be required to complete a course of training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force. The course of training in the carrying and use of firearms shall not be required of any
 employee who is not required or permitted by a licensee to carry or use firearms. The course in the carrying and use of firearms and the course of training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force shall meet the standards which shall be prescribed by the Department of Consumer Affairs. The department shall encourage restraint and caution in the use of firearms.

(b) No licensee or uniformed employee of a licensee shall carry or use any firearm unless the licensee or employee has in their possession a valid firearms qualification card.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 697, Sec. 8) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 19.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.6.

(a) Each applicant for a security guard registration shall complete a course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force as a condition for the issuance of the registration. A course provider authorized to provide the training pursuant to Section 7583.7 shall issue a certificate of completion to the person upon satisfactory completion of the training. The course provider shall conduct the training in accordance with Section 7583.7 and any applicable regulations adopted by the bureau. The training shall be administered and certified by a single course provider, pursuant to subdivision (f), and shall be completed within six months preceding the date the application is submitted to the bureau.

(b) Except for a registrant who has completed the course of training required by Section 7583.45, a security guard registrant shall complete not less than 32 hours of training in security officer skills within six months from the date an initial registration is issued. A security guard registrant shall complete 16 of the 32 hours within 30 days from the date the registration is issued.

(c) A course provider, which is authorized to provide the training required by subdivision (b) pursuant to subdivision (f), shall issue a certificate of completion to a registrant after the registrant completes each training course. The course provider shall conduct the trainings in accordance with any applicable regulations adopted by the bureau subject to this chapter.

(d) (1) A registrant who is unable to provide their employing licensee the certificate of satisfactory completion of the training required by subdivision (a) shall complete the training within six months of the registrant’s employment date.

(2) A registrant who is unable to provide their employing licensee the certificate of satisfactory completion of the training required by subdivision (b) shall complete 16 hours of the training within 30 days of the registrant’s employment date and shall complete the 16 remaining hours within six months of the registrant’s employment date.

(e) A registrant shall annually complete eight hours of specifically dedicated review or practice of security officer skills prescribed
 in this section, Section 7583.7, or by the bureau by regulation.

(f) The trainings specified in this section may be administered, tested, and certified by one of the following:

(1) Any licensee, provided that the licensee shall provide the training only to their applicants for employment and direct employees.

(2) Any training facility certified pursuant to this chapter.

(3) Any organization or school approved by the bureau. The bureau shall approve any instructor of an organization or school who
 will administer the trainings specified in this section to ensure that the organization or school complies with the requirements of this chapter, as well as any applicable regulations.

(g) (1) A registrant shall maintain the certificate of completion the registrant received for each training course prescribed in this section until the registration expires or has been canceled. The registrant shall provide the records to the bureau upon request.

(2) A licensee shall maintain at the principal place of business or branch office a record for each of its registrant employees verifying completion of the trainings required by this section for the duration of the registrant’s employment. The records shall be available for inspection by the bureau upon request.

(h) This section does not apply to a peace officer as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code who has successfully completed a course of study in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training or a federal qualified law enforcement officer, as defined in Section 926B of Title 18 of the United States Code, who has successfully completed a course of study in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force.

(i) This section does not apply to armored vehicle guards.

(j) (1) The bureau shall develop and approve by regulation a standard course and
 curriculum for the skills trainings required by this section to promote and protect the safety of persons and the security of property.

(2) The bureau shall develop an outline for the course and curriculum described in paragraph (1) in consultation with the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 94, Sec. 1.   (SB 652)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.7.

(a) The course of training in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force may be administered, tested, and certified by any licensee or by any organization or school approved by the department. The department may approve any person or school to teach the course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force. The department may review and provide more guidance on courses of training when best practices are updated. The course of training shall be approximately eight hours in length and shall cover all of the following topics:

(1) Responsibilities and ethics in citizen arrest.

(2) Relationship between a security guard and a peace officer in making an arrest.

(3) Limitations on security guard power to arrest.

(4) Restrictions on searches and seizures.

(5) Criminal and civil liabilities, including both of the following:

(A) Personal liability.

(B) Employer liability.

(6) Trespass law.

(7) Ethics and communications.

(8) Emergency situation response, including response to medical emergencies.

(9) Security officer safety.

(10) The appropriate use of force, including all of the following topics:

(A) Legal standards for use of force.

(B) Duty to intercede.

(C) The use of objectively reasonable force.

(D) Supervisory responsibilities.

(E) Use of force review and analysis.

(F) De-escalation and interpersonal communication training, including tactical methods that use time, distance, cover, and concealment, to avoid
 escalating situations that lead to violence.

(G) Implicit and explicit bias and cultural competency.

(H) Skills, including de-escalation techniques, to effectively, safely, and respectfully interact with people with disabilities or behavioral health issues.

(I) Use of force scenario training, including simulations of low-frequency, high-risk situations and calls for service, shoot-or-don’t-shoot situations, and real-time force option decisionmaking.

(J) Mental health and policing, including bias and stigma.

(K) Active shooter situations.

(11) Any
 other topic deemed appropriate by the bureau, excluding Weapons of Mass Destruction and Terrorism Awareness, which may be an elective topic only.

(b) (1) The majority of the course shall be taught by means of verbal instruction. This instruction may include the use of a video presentation.

(2) Paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) shall be conducted through traditional classroom instruction. For the purposes of this paragraph, “traditional classroom instruction” means instruction where the instructor is physically present with students in a classroom for a minimum of 50 percent of the course and is available at all times, including during instruction provided through distance learning or remote platforms, to answer students’ questions while providing the
 required training. In this setting, the instructor provides demonstrations and hands-on instruction in order to establish each student’s proficiency as to the course content.

(c) (1) The department shall make available a guidebook as a standard for teaching the course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force, which may be known as the Power to Arrest and Appropriate Use of Force Manual. The department shall encourage additional training and may provide a training guide recommending additional courses to be taken by security personnel.

(2) The development, adoption, amendment, or repeal of the Power to Arrest and Appropriate Use of Force Manual by the
 bureau is exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(d) Private patrol operators may provide a copy of the Power to Arrest and Appropriate Use of Force Manual to each person that they currently employ as a security guard. The private patrol operator may provide the guidebook to each person the private patrol operator intends to hire as a security guard a reasonable time prior to the time the person begins the course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force.

(e) The bureau may inspect, supervise, or view the administration of the test at any time and without any prior notification. Any impropriety in the administration of the course or
 the test shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 1.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.8.

A licensee shall not permit an employee to perform the functions of a security guard without confirming that the person holds a current and valid security guard registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 377, Sec. 22.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.9.

(a) The security guard registration applicant shall submit the application, the registration fee, and their fingerprints, either in the form of classifiable fingerprint cards or in an electronic format pursuant to subdivision (c), to the bureau. The bureau shall forward the classifiable fingerprint cards to the Department of Justice. The Department of Justice shall forward one classifiable fingerprint card to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for purposes of a background check.

(b) If a private patrol operator pays the application fee on behalf of the applicant, nothing in this section shall preclude the private patrol operator from withholding the amount of the fee from the applicant’s compensation.

(c) In lieu of classifiable fingerprint cards provided for in this section, the bureau may authorize applicants to submit their fingerprints into an electronic fingerprinting system administered by the Department of Justice. Applicants who submit their fingerprints by electronic means shall have their fingerprints entered into the system through a terminal operated by a law enforcement agency or other facility authorized by the Department of Justice to conduct electronic fingerprinting. The enforcement agency responsible for operating the terminal may charge a fee sufficient to reimburse it for the costs incurred in providing this service.

(d) Upon receipt of an applicant’s electronic or hard card fingerprints as provided in this section, the Department of Justice shall disseminate the following information to the bureau:

(1) Every conviction rendered against the
 applicant.

(2) Every arrest for an offense for which the applicant is presently awaiting trial, whether the applicant is incarcerated or has been released on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial.

(e) (1) The requirement in subdivision (a) to submit a fingerprint card does not apply to any of the following:

(A) A currently employed, full-time peace officer holding peace officer status under Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(B) A level I or level II reserve officer under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 832.6 of the Penal Code.

(2) An individual listed in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) may immediately
 perform the functions of a security guard or security patrolperson provided that the individual has submitted an application, the applicable fees, and their fingerprints, if required to submit fingerprints pursuant to subdivision (a), to the bureau for a security guard registration.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to a peace officer required to obtain a firearm qualification card pursuant to Section 7583.12.

(f) Peace officers exempt from the submission of classifiable fingerprints pursuant to subdivision (e) shall submit verification of their active duty peace officer status to the bureau with their application for registration. A photocopy of the front and back of their peace officer identification badge shall be adequate verification.

(g) Peace officers exempt from the submission of classifiable fingerprints
 pursuant to subdivision (e) shall report a change in their active duty peace officer status to the bureau within 72 hours of the change in active duty peace officer status.

(h) (1) Peace officers exempt from obtaining a firearm qualification card pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 7583.12 or exempt from obtaining a baton permit pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 7584.1 shall submit to the bureau with their application for registration a letter of approval from their primary employer authorizing the peace officer to carry a firearm or baton while working as a security guard or security officer.

(2) For purposes of this section, “primary employer” means a public safety agency currently employing a peace officer subject to this section.

(i) In addition to the amount authorized pursuant to Section 7570.1, the
 bureau may impose an additional fee not to exceed three dollars ($3) for processing classifiable fingerprint cards submitted by applicants excluding those submitted into an electronic fingerprint system using electronic fingerprint technology.

(j) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 24) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 25.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.10.

The application shall be verified and shall include all of the following:

(a) The full name, residence address, telephone number, and date of birth of the applicant.

(b) The name of the entity that administered the course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force to the applicant.

(1) If the course provider is a licensee, the bureau-issued license number.

(2) If the course provider is a certified firearms training facility or baton training facility, the bureau-issued facility certificate number.

(3) If the course provider is an approved trainer in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force, the approved trainer number issued by the bureau.

(c) The name of the person who taught the course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force completed by the applicant.

(d) The serial number on the certificate of completion the course provider issued to the applicant upon completion of the course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force.

(e) A statement that the applicant has completed the training course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force, as
 specified in Section 7583.7, within six months preceding the date the application is submitted to the bureau, pursuant to Section 7583.6.

(f) A statement as to whether the applicant has been convicted of a misdemeanor, excluding minor traffic violations.

(g) A statement as to whether the applicant has been convicted of a felony.

(h) The application fee provided for in this chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant thereto, except as provided in Section 7583.9.

(i) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 94, Sec. 2.   (SB 652)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.12.

(a) An employee of a licensee shall not carry or use a firearm unless the employee has in their possession both of the following:

(1) A valid guard registration card issued pursuant to this chapter.

(2) A valid firearm qualification card issued pursuant to this chapter.

(b) An employee of a licensee may carry or use a firearm while working as a security guard or security patrolperson pending receipt of a firearm qualification card if the employee has been approved by the bureau and carries on their person a hardcopy printout of the bureau’s approval from the bureau’s internet website and a valid picture identification.

(c) Paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) and subdivision (b) shall not apply to a duly appointed peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, who meets all of the following:

(1) The peace officer has successfully completed a course of study in the use of firearms.

(2) The peace officer is authorized to carry a concealed firearm in the course and scope of their employment pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 25450) of Chapter 2 of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code.

(3) The peace officer has proof that they have applied to the bureau for a firearm qualification card.

(d) (1) This
 section shall not apply to a duly appointed peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, or a federal qualified law enforcement officer, as defined in Section 926B of Title 18 of the United States Code, who has written approval from their primary employer, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 7583.9, to carry a firearm while working as a security guard.

(2) A peace officer exempt under this subdivision shall carry on their person a letter of approval from their primary employer authorizing the peace officer to carry a firearm while working as a security guard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 377, Sec. 25.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.13.

(a) The bureau, upon receipt of a criminal offense record or record of a subsequent arrest from the Department of Justice, shall make an immediate determination of fitness of (1) applicants for registration under this article, or (2) applicants for firearm qualification cards, when information contained in the records of the Department of Justice makes this determination possible. Applications of those determined to be unfit shall be immediately denied.

(b) The bureau shall keep a current and accurate record of the individuals who have applied for and been denied registration under this article or a firearms qualification card. A list consisting of individual names and other pertinent identifying information may be made of those individuals who have been denied registration. The list may be updated bimonthly and made available to interested licensees and law enforcement agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.14.

(a) If the chief determines that an applicant’s criminal history contains open arrest information, the chief shall issue a notice to the applicant allowing 45 days for the applicant to provide documentation concerning the disposition of the arrest or arrests.

(b) The notice shall be sent to the applicant at his or her last known residential address and shall provide sufficient information to assist the applicant in complying with the chief’s request. If the applicant fails to respond within 45 days, the applicant’s employment shall be automatically suspended until the bureau obtains the necessary documentation to approve or deny the application, or suspend the registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.16.

(a) The director may deny an application for registration, or may suspend or revoke a previously issued registration, if the individual has committed any action which, if committed by a licensee, would be grounds for refusing to issue a license, or for the suspension or revocation of a license issued under this chapter.

(b) The denial of an application for registration under this article shall be in writing and shall describe the basis for the denial. The denial shall inform the applicant that if the applicant desires a review by a disciplinary review committee to contest the denial, the review shall be requested of the director within 30 days following notice of the issuance of the
 denial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 377, Sec. 27.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.17.

(a) Upon approval of an application for registration, the chief shall cause to be issued to the applicant at his or her last known residential address a registration card in a form approved by the director.

(b) A person may work as a security guard or security patrolperson pending receipt of the registration card if he or she has been approved by the bureau and carries on his or her person a hardcopy printout of the bureau’s approval from the bureau’s Internet Web site and a valid picture identification.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 38) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 39.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.18.

A qualified manager who complies with Section 7582.22 is not required to register under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.19.

A licensee shall at all times be responsible for ascertaining that those of their employees who are subject to registration are currently registered as provided in this article. A licensee may not have a person whose registration has expired or been revoked, denied, suspended, or canceled perform security guard duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 377, Sec. 28.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.20.

(a) A registration issued under this chapter expires at midnight on the last day of the month two years following the date of issuance unless renewed. At least 60 days prior to the expiration, a registrant seeking to renew a security guard registration shall forward to the bureau a completed registration renewal application and the renewal fee. The renewal application shall be on a form prescribed by the director, dated and signed by the applicant, certifying under penalty of perjury that the information in the application is true and correct.

(b) The licensee shall provide to any employee information regarding procedures for renewal of registration.

(c) In the event a registrant fails to request a
 renewal of their registration as provided for in this chapter, the registration shall expire as indicated on the registration. If the registration is renewed within 60 days after its expiration, the registrant, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall pay the renewal fee and the delinquency fee. A person is prohibited from performing the duties of a security guard with an expired registration.

(d) If the renewed registration card has not been delivered to the registrant before the expiration of the prior registration but the bureau has renewed the registration, the registrant may work as a security guard pending receipt of the renewed registration card, as specified in Section 7583.17.

(e) A registration may not be renewed or reinstated unless a registrant meets both of the following requirements:

(1) All fines
 assessed pursuant to Section 7587.7 and not resolved in accordance with the provisions of that section have been paid.

(2) The applicant for registration renewal certifies, on a form prescribed by the bureau, that the applicant has completed the 32 hours of the training required by subdivision (b) of Section 7583.6 and the annual training required by subdivision (e) of Section 7583.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 377, Sec. 29.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.21.

The registration of a security guard shall be automatically suspended if the guard is convicted of any crime that is substantially related to the functions, duties, and responsibilities of a security guard. The automatic suspension shall be effectuated by the mailing of a notice of conviction and suspension of license to be sent by the bureau to the registered guard at his or her address of record.
 The notice shall contain a statement of preliminary determination by the director or his or her designee that the crime stated is reasonably related to the functions, duties, and responsibilities of a security guard. Upon proper request by the guard, a hearing shall be convened within 60 days of the request, before the private security disciplinary review committee, as specified in Section 7581.3, for a determination as to whether the automatic suspension shall be made permanent or whether the registration shall be revoked or the guard otherwise disciplined.

In enacting this provision, the Legislature finds and declares that registered guards convicted of the commission of crimes reasonably related to the functions, duties, and responsibilities of a security guard shall be subject to automatic suspension of their license and that summary
 suspension is justified by compelling state interests of public safety and security within the meaning of the California Supreme Court’s decision in Eye Dog Foundation v. State Board of Guide Dogs for the Blind, 67 Cal. 2d 536.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 34.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.22.

(a) A licensee, qualified manager of a licensee, or security guard who, in the course of their employment, may be required to carry a firearm shall, prior to carrying a firearm, do all of the following:

(1) Complete a course of training in the carrying and use of firearms.

(2) Receive a firearms qualification card or be otherwise qualified to carry a firearm as provided in Section 7583.12.

(b) A security guard who, in the course of their employment, may be required to carry a firearm, shall, prior to carrying a firearm, be found capable of exercising appropriate judgment, restraint, and self-control for the purposes of carrying and
 using a firearm during the course of their duties, pursuant to Section 7583.47.

(c) A licensee shall not permit an employee to carry or use a loaded or unloaded firearm, whether or not it is serviceable or operative, unless the employee possesses a valid and current firearms qualification card issued by the bureau or is so otherwise qualified to carry a firearm as provided in Section 7583.12.

(d) A pocket card issued by the bureau pursuant to Section 7582.13 may also serve as a firearms qualification card if so indicated on the face of the card.

(e) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not apply to either of the following:

(1) A peace officer as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, who has
 successfully completed a course of study in the use of firearms within the 24 months preceding the date of the application.

(2) A federal qualified law enforcement officer, as defined in Section 926B of Title 18 of the United States Code, who has successfully completed a course of study in the use of firearms within the 24 months preceding the date of application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 34.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.23.

The bureau shall issue a firearms permit when all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The applicant is a licensee, a qualified manager of a licensee, or a registered security guard subject to the following:

(1) The firearms permit may only be associated with the following:

(A) A sole owner of a sole ownership licensee, pursuant to Section 7582.7 or 7525.1.

(B) A partner of a partnership licensee, pursuant to Section 7582.7 or 7525.1.

(C) A qualified manager of a licensee, pursuant to Section 7536 or 7582.22.

(D) A security guard registrant.

(2) If the firearms permit is associated with a security guard registration, they are subject to the provisions of Section 7583.47, regardless of any other license possessed or associated with the firearms permit.

(b) (1) A bureau-certified firearms training instructor has certified that the applicant has successfully completed a written examination prepared by the bureau and training course in the carrying and use of firearms approved by the bureau within the six months preceding the date the application is submitted to the bureau.

(2) An applicant who is a bureau-certified firearms training instructor is prohibited from self-certifying as having successfully carried out the requirements of paragraph
 (1) and shall instead carry out the requirements under another bureau-certified firearms training instructor.
